lexicon.lexc
+VTI+Pcp+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+%0SgObj+%0SgHead:ooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+%0PlObj+%0PlHead:ooyangibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+%0SgObj+%0SgHead:ooyangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Pos+Prt+XSubj+%0PlObj+%0PlHead:oongibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Pos+Prt+XSubj+%0SgObj+%0SgHead:oongiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTI, Class: VTI_aa, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other             !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_Class=VTI_aa_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0PlObj+%0PlHead:nzinijin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0PlObj+3PlObvHead:nzinijin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj+%0SgObj+3PlObvHead:nzinijin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0PlObj+3PlProxHead:nzijig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj+%0SgObj+3PlProxHead:nzijig EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj+%0PlHead:nzinijin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0PlObj+3SgObvHead:nzinijin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj+%0SgObj+3SgObvHead:nzinijin EncliticRoot ;
+VTI+Pcp+Neg+Neu+3SgProxSubj+%0PlObj+%0PlHead:nzijin EncliticRoot ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!   PV lexicons start     !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PreadverbRoot
LexPA ;
AdverbStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!        Lexical PV       !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON LexPABoundary
0:- LexPA ;

LEXICON PreadverbEnd
0:%<%< AdverbStems ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!   PV lexicons start     !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PrenounRoot
LexPN ;
NounStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!        Lexical PV       !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON LexPNBoundary
0:- LexPN ;

LEXICON PrenounEnd
0:%<%< NounStems ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!   PV lexicons start     !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PreverbRoot
SubPV ;
VerbStems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!   Subordinating PV      !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SubPV
@U.Order.Cnj@ SubPVPlainConjunct ;
TensePV ;

LEXICON SubPVPlainConjunct
ChCnj+:0 ChCnjPV ;
@D.ChCnj@PVSub%/e+:@D.ChCnj@e SubPVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVSub%/a+:@D.ChCnj@a SubPVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVSub%/gaa+:@D.ChCnj@gaa SubPVBoundary ;

LEXICON ChCnjPV
@U.ChCnj.On@ TensePVChangedConjunct ;
@U.ChCnj.On@ DirPVChangedConjunct ;
@U.ChCnj.On@:@U.ChCnj.On@%<ChCnj%> TensePV ;

LEXICON SubPVBoundary
0:- TensePV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!        Tense PV         !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON TensePV
TensePVAny ;
@U.Order.Ind@ TensePVIndependent ;
@U.Order.Cnj@ TensePVPlainConjunct ;
DirPV ;

LEXICON TensePVAny
PVTense%/gii+:gii%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/gii'+:gii'%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/wii+:wii%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/wii'+:wii'%<T%> TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/jibwaa+:jibwaa TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/aano+:aano TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/aana+:aana TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVIndependent
PVTense%/ga+:ga TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:daa TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:daa TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVPlainConjunct
@D.ChCnj@PVTense%/ga+:@D.ChCnj@ji TensePVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVTense%/daa+:@D.ChCnj@ji TensePVBoundary ;
@D.ChCnj@PVTense%/daa+:@D.ChCnj@da TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVChangedConjunct
PVTense%/ga+:ge TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:ge TensePVBoundary ;
PVTense%/daa+:ge TensePVBoundary ;

LEXICON TensePVBoundary 
@C.ChCnj@:@C.ChCnj@- TensePV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!     Directional PV      !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON DirPV
DirPVAny ;
@U.Order.Ind@ DirPVIndependent ;
@U.Order.Cnj@ DirPVPlainConjunct ;
RelPV ;

LEXICON DirPVAny
PVDir%/ani+:ani DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ini+:ini DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/awi+:awi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/owi+:owi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/baa+:baa DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/babaa+:babaa DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/bibaa+:bibaa DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/biiji+:biiji DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/bi+:bi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/bimi+:bimi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ni+:ni DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/o+:o DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ombi+:ombi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/wi+:wi DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/zaagiji+:zaagiji DirPVBoundary ;

LEXICON DirPVIndependent
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON DirPVPlainConjunct
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON DirPVChangedConjunct
PVDir%/bi+:ba DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/ni+:eni DirPVBoundary ;
PVDir%/wi+:wi DirPVBoundary ;

LEXICON DirPVBoundary 
@C.ChCnj@:@C.ChCnj@- DirPV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!       Relative PV       !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON RelPV
RelPVAny ;
@U.Order.Ind@ RelPVIndependent ;
@U.Order.Cnj@ RelPVPlainConjunct ;
LexPV ;

LEXICON RelPVAny
PVRel%/ako+:ako RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/apiichi+:apiichi RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/dazhi+:dazhi RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/dazhi+:dazhi RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/daso+:daso RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/onji+:onji RelPVBoundary ;
PVRel%/izhi+:izhi RelPVBoundary ;

LEXICON RelPVIndependent
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON RelPVPlainConjunct
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON RelPVChangedConjunct
%<EMPTYLEX%> # ;

LEXICON RelPVBoundary 
@C.ChCnj@:@C.ChCnj@- RelPV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                         !!
!!        Lexical PV       !!
!!                         !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON LexPV
LexPVAny ;
@U.Order.Ind@ LexPVIndependent ;
@U.Order.Cnj@ LexPVPlainConjunct ;
PreverbEnd ;

LEXICON LexPVBoundary
0:- LexPV "weight: 5";

LEXICON PreverbEnd
0:%<%< VerbStems ;

LEXICON LexPA
PVQnt%/ningo+:ningo LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/niso+:niso LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/waasamoo+:waasamoo LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/maji+:majiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/waabi+:waabiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/jiigi+:jiigiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/ogiji+:ogijiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/bibine+:bibine LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/ando+:andow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/ashki+:ashkiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/miigwechiwi+:miigwechiwiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/azhe+:azhe LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/waabanoo+:waabanoo LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/nitaa+:nitaa LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/baashki+:baashkiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/wiiji+:wiijiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/bigii+:bigii LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/maazhi+:maazhiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/gijigi+:gijigiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/aazhawi+:aazhawiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/agiji+:agijiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/giimooji+:giimoojiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/gimooji+:gimoojiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/mishi+:mishiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/awasi+:awasiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/misko+:miskow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/ginwaakojii+:ginwaakojii LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/noozhe+:noozhe LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/wiishkobi+:wiishkobiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/zhiibaa+:zhiibaa LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/asho+:ashow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/biichi+:biichiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/gwayako+:gwayakow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/mangi+:mangiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/nanda+:nandaw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/biini+:biiniw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/noosooki+:noosookiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/biisi+:biisiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/ayaangwaami+:ayaangwaamiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVLex%/goshko+:goshkow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/nenishwaaswi+:nenishwaaswiw2 LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-nishwaaso+:ashi-nishwaasow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/niso+:nisow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/bezhigo+:bezhigow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-niizhwaaso+:ashi-niizhwaasow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/niiyo+:niiyow2 LexPABoundary ;
PVQnt%/zhaangaso+:zhaangasow2 LexPABoundary ;
LEXICON LexPN
PNQnt%/ningo+:ningo LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/niso+:niso LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/waasamoo+:waasamoo LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/maji+:majiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/waabi+:waabiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/jiigi+:jiigiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/bibine+:bibine LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/ashki+:ashkiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/miigwechiwi+:miigwechiwiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/azhe+:azhe LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/waabanoo+:waabanoo LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/nitaa+:nitaa LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/baashki+:baashkiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/wiiji+:wiijiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/bigii+:bigii LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/maazhi+:maazhiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/gijigi+:gijigiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/aazhawi+:aazhawiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/agiji+:agijiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/giimooji+:giimoojiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/gimooji+:gimoojiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/mishi+:mishiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/awasi+:awasiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/misko+:miskow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/ginwaakojii+:ginwaakojii LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/noozhe+:noozhe LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/wiishkobi+:wiishkobiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/zhiibaa+:zhiibaa LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/asho+:ashow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/biichi+:biichiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/gwayako+:gwayakow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/mangi+:mangiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/nanda+:nandaw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/biini+:biiniw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/noosooki+:noosookiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/biisi+:biisiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/ayaangwaami+:ayaangwaamiw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNLex%/goshko+:goshkow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/naano+:naanow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/niizhwaaso+:niizhwaasow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/niizho+:niizhow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/aabita+:aabitaw2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/ishwaaso+:ishwaasow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/ningodwaaso+:ningodwaasow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/ashi-naano+:ashi-naanow2 LexPNBoundary ;
PNQnt%/ashi-niiwo+:ashi-niiwow2 LexPNBoundary ;
LEXICON LexPVAny
PVQnt%/ningo+:ningo LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/niso+:niso LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waasamoo+:waasamoo LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/maji+:majiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waabi+:waabiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/jiigi+:jiigiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bibine+:bibine LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ashki+:ashkiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/miigwechiwi+:miigwechiwiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/azhe+:azhe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/waabanoo+:waabanoo LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nitaa+:nitaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/baashki+:baashkiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wiiji+:wiijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/bigii+:bigii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/maazhi+:maazhiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gijigi+:gijigiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/aazhawi+:aazhawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/agiji+:agijiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/giimooji+:giimoojiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gimooji+:gimoojiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/mishi+:mishiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/awasi+:awasiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/misko+:miskow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ginwaakojii+:ginwaakojii LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/noozhe+:noozhe LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/wiishkobi+:wiishkobiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/zhiibaa+:zhiibaa LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/asho+:ashow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biichi+:biichiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/gwayako+:gwayakow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/mangi+:mangiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/nanda+:nandaw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biini+:biiniw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/noosooki+:noosookiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/biisi+:biisiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/ayaangwaami+:ayaangwaamiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/goshko+:goshkow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVLex%/maamawi+:maamawiw2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-ningodwaaso+:ashi-ningodwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ingo+:ingow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-niizho+:ashi-niizhow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-bezhigo+:ashi-bezhigow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-ingodwaaso+:ashi-ingodwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-niiyo+:ashi-niiyow2 LexPVBoundary ;
PVQnt%/ashi-ishwaaso+:ashi-ishwaasow2 LexPVBoundary ;
